Nebraska, session 109, LB793.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 44-6408, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-6408 (1) No policy insuring against liability imposed by law for
bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death suffered by a natural person
arising out of the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motor
vehicle within the United States, its territories or possessions, or
Canada shall be delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed with respect
to any motor vehicle principally garaged in this state unless coverage is
provided for the protection of persons insured who are legally entitled
to recover compensatory damages for bodily injury, sickness, disease, or
death from (a) the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle in
limits of fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury,
sickness, disease, or death of one person in any one accident and,
subject to such limit for one person, one hundred fifty thousand dollars
because of bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death of two or more
persons in any one accident, and (b) the owner or operator of an
underinsured motor vehicle in limits of fifty twenty-five thousand
dollars because of bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death of one
person in any one accident and, subject to such limit for one person, one
hundred fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury, sickness,
disease, or death of two or more persons in any one accident.
(2) At the written request of the named insured, the insurer shall
provide higher limits of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverages in
accordance with its rating plan and rules, except that in no event shall
the insurer be required to provide limits higher than one hundred
thousand dollars per person and three hundred thousand dollars per
accident.
(3) After purchase of uninsured and underinsured motorist coverages,
no insurer or any affiliated insurer shall be required to notify any
policyholder in any renewal, reinstatement, substitute, amended, altered,
modified, transfer, or replacement policy as to the availability of
-2-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
optional limits of such coverages. The named insured may, subject to the
limitations of this section, make a written request for additional
coverage or coverage more extensive than that provided in a prior policy.
Sec. 2. Section 60-310, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-310 Automobile liability policy means liability insurance written
by an insurance carrier duly authorized to do business in this state
protecting other persons from damages for liability on account of
accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the insurance
arising out of the ownership of a motor vehicle (1) in the amount of
fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death
of one person in any one accident, (2) subject to the limit for one
person, in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of
bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and
(3) in the amount of fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury
to or destruction of property of other persons in any one accident. An
automobile liability policy shall not exclude, limit, reduce, or
otherwise alter liability coverage under the policy solely because the
injured person making a claim is the named insured in the policy or
residing in the household with the named insured.
Sec. 3. Section 60-346, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-346 Proof of financial responsibility means evidence of ability
to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring
subsequent to the effective date of such proof, arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, (1) in the amount of
fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death
of one person in any one accident, (2) subject to such limit for one
person, in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of
bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and
(3) in the amount of fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury
-3-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.
Sec. 4. Section 60-501, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-501 For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Department means Department of Motor Vehicles;
(2) Former military vehicle means a motor vehicle that was
manufactured for use in any country's military forces and is maintained
to accurately represent its military design and markings, regardless of
the vehicle's size or weight, but is no longer used, or never was used,
by a military force;
(3) Golf car vehicle means a vehicle that has at least four wheels,
has a maximum level ground speed of less than twenty miles per hour, has
a maximum payload capacity of one thousand two hundred pounds, has a
maximum gross vehicle weight of two thousand five hundred pounds, has a
maximum passenger capacity of not more than four persons, and is designed
and manufactured for operation on a golf course for sporting and
recreational purposes;
(4) Judgment means any judgment which shall have become final by the
expiration of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected
without being appealed, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a
court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, (a)
upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use
of any motor vehicle for damages, including damages for care and loss of
services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person or for
damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the
loss of use thereof, or (b) upon a cause of action on an agreement of
settlement for such damages;
(5) License means any license issued to any person under the laws of
this state pertaining to operation of a motor vehicle within this state;
(6)(a) Low-speed vehicle means any:
-4-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
(i) Four-wheeled motor vehicle:
(A) With a speed attainable in one mile of more than twenty miles
per hour and not more than twenty-five miles per hour on a paved, level
surface;
(B) With a gross vehicle weight rating of less than three thousand
pounds; and
(C) That complies with 49 C.F.R. part 571, as such part existed on
January 1, 2025; or
(ii) Three-wheeled motor vehicle:
(A) With a speed attainable of not more than twenty-five miles per
hour on a paved, level surface;
(B) With a gross vehicle weight rating of less than three thousand
pounds; and
(C) That is equipped with a windshield and an occupant protection
system.
(b) Low-speed vehicle does not include a motorcycle with a sidecar;
(7) Minitruck means a foreign-manufactured import vehicle or
domestic-manufactured vehicle which (a) is powered by an internal
combustion engine with a piston or rotor displacement of one thousand
five hundred cubic centimeters or less, (b) is sixty-seven inches or less
in width, (c) has a dry weight of four thousand two hundred pounds or
less, (d) travels on four or more tires, (e) has a top speed of
approximately fifty-five miles per hour, (f) is equipped with a bed or
compartment for hauling, (g) has an enclosed passenger cab, (h) is
equipped with headlights, taillights, turnsignals, windshield wipers, a
rearview mirror, and an occupant protection system, and (i) has a four-
speed, five-speed, or automatic transmission;
(8) Motor vehicle means any self-propelled vehicle which is designed
for use upon a highway, including trailers designed for use with such
vehicles, minitrucks, and low-speed vehicles. Motor vehicle includes a
former military vehicle. Motor vehicle does not include (a) mopeds as
-5-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
defined in section 60-637, (b) traction engines, (c) road rollers, (d)
farm tractors, (e) tractor cranes, (f) power shovels, (g) well drillers,
(h) every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead wires but not operated upon rails, (i) electric personal
assistive mobility devices as defined in section 60-618.02, (j) off-road
designed vehicles, including, but not limited to, golf car vehicles, go-
carts, riding lawnmowers, garden tractors, all-terrain vehicles and
utility-type vehicles as defined in section 60-6,355, minibikes as
defined in section 60-636, and snowmobiles as defined in section 60-663,
and (k) bicycles as defined in section 60-611;
(9) Nonresident means every person who is not a resident of this
state;
(10) Nonresident's operating privilege means the privilege conferred
upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation
by him or her of a motor vehicle or the use of a motor vehicle owned by
him or her in this state;
(11) Operator means every person who is in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(12) Owner means a person who holds the legal title of a motor
vehicle, or in the event (a) a motor vehicle is the subject of an
agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of
purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and
with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or
lessee or (b) a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then
such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner
for the purposes of the act;
(13) Person means every natural person, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, association, or corporation;
(14) Proof of financial responsibility means evidence of ability to
respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring
subsequent to the effective date of such proof, arising out of the
-6-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, (a) in the amount of
fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death
of one person in any one accident, (b) subject to such limit for one
person, in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of
bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and
(c) in the amount of fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury
to or destruction of property of others in any one accident;
(15) Registration means registration certificate or certificates and
registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the
registration of motor vehicles;
(16) State means any state, territory, or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of
Canada; and
(17) The forfeiture of bail, not vacated, or of collateral deposited
to secure an appearance for trial shall be regarded as equivalent to
conviction of the offense charged.
Sec. 5. Section 60-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-509 No such policy or bond shall be effective under section
60-508 unless issued by an insurance company or surety company authorized
to do business in this state, except that if such motor vehicle was not
registered in this state or was a motor vehicle which was registered
elsewhere than in this state at the effective date of a policy or bond or
the most recent renewal thereof, such policy or bond shall not be
effective under section 60-508 unless the insurance company or surety
company, if not authorized to do business in this state, shall execute an
acknowledgment that the company shall be amenable to process issued by a
court of this state in any action upon such policy or bond arising out of
such accident. Every such policy or bond is subject, if the accident has
resulted in bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death, to a limit,
exclusive of interest and costs, of not less than fifty twenty-five
-7-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in
any one accident and, subject to such limit for one person, to a limit of
not less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury
to or death of two or more persons in any one accident and, if the
accident has resulted in injury to or destruction of property, to a limit
of not less than fifty twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to
or destruction of property of others in any one accident. Upon receipt of
a notice of such accident, the insurance company or surety company which
issued such policy or bond shall furnish, for filing with the department,
a written notice that such policy or bond was in effect at the time of
such accident.
Sec. 6. Section 60-534, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-534 Such motor vehicle liability policy shall (1) designate by
explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles with
respect to which coverage is thereby to be granted and (2) insure the
person named therein and any other person, as insured, using any such
motor vehicle or motor vehicles with the express or implied permission of
such named insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for
damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of such motor
vehicle or motor vehicles within the United States of America or the
Dominion of Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs,
with respect to each such motor vehicle as follows: Fifty Twenty-five
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in
any one accident and, subject to such limit for one person, one hundred
fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or
more persons in any one accident, and fifty twenty-five thousand dollars
because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one
accident.
Sec. 7. Section 60-549, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-8-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
60-549 Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the
certificate of the State Treasurer that the person named in the
certificate has deposited with him or her an amount equal to the sum of
the amounts specified in subdivisions (14)(b) and (c) of section 60-501
seventy-five thousand dollars per vehicle in cash or securities such as
may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of a market
value of such amount seventy-five thousand dollars. The State Treasurer
shall not accept any such deposit and issue a certificate therefor and
the department shall not accept such certificate unless it is accompanied
by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character
against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides.
Sec. 8. Section 60-6,381, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-6,381 (1)(a) A city or village may adopt an ordinance authorizing
the operation of golf car vehicles within the corporate limits of the
city or village if the operation is on streets adjacent and contiguous to
a golf course.
(b) A county board may adopt an ordinance pursuant to section 23-187
authorizing the operation of golf car vehicles within the county if the
operation is on roads adjacent and contiguous to a golf course.
(c) Any person operating a golf car vehicle as authorized under this
subsection shall have a valid Class O operator's license, and the owner
of the golf car vehicle shall have liability insurance coverage for the
golf car vehicle. The person operating the golf car vehicle shall provide
proof of such insurance coverage to any peace officer requesting such
proof within five days after such a request.
(d) The restrictions of subsection (2) of this section do not apply
to ordinances adopted under this subsection.
(2)(a) A city or village may adopt an ordinance authorizing the
operation of golf car vehicles on streets within the corporate limits of
the city or village if the operation is (i) between sunrise and sunset
-9-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
and (ii) on streets with a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per
hour or less. When operating a golf car vehicle as authorized under this
subsection, the operator shall not operate such vehicle at a speed in
excess of twenty miles per hour. A golf car vehicle shall not be operated
at any time on any state or federal highway but may be operated upon such
a highway in order to cross a portion of the highway system which
intersects a street as directed in subsection (3) of this section. A city
or village may, as part of such ordinance, implement standards for
operation of golf car vehicles that are more stringent than the
restrictions of this subsection for the safety of the operator and the
public.
(b) A county board may adopt an ordinance pursuant to section 23-187
authorizing the operation of golf car vehicles on roads within the county
if the operation is (i) between sunrise and sunset and (ii) on roads with
a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less. When
operating a golf car vehicle as authorized under this subsection, the
operator shall not operate such vehicle at a speed in excess of twenty
miles per hour. A golf car vehicle shall not be operated at any time on
any state or federal highway but may be operated upon such highway in
order to cross a portion of the highway system which intersects a road as
directed in subsection (3) of this section. A county may, as part of such
ordinance, implement standards for operation of golf car vehicles that
are more stringent than the restrictions of this subsection for the
safety of the operator and the public.
(c) Any person operating a golf car vehicle as authorized under this
subsection shall have a valid Class O operator's license, and the owner
of the golf car vehicle shall have liability insurance coverage for the
golf car vehicle. The person operating the golf car vehicle shall provide
proof of such insurance coverage to any peace officer requesting such
proof within five days after such a request. The liability insurance
coverage shall be subject to limits, exclusive of interest and costs, as
-10-

LB793 LB793
2026 2026
follows: Fifty Twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to
or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to such limit for
one person, one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury
to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and fifty twenty-
five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of
others in any one accident.
(3) The crossing of a highway shall be permitted by a golf car
vehicle only if:
(a) The crossing is made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees
to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction
prevents a quick and safe crossing;
(b) The golf car vehicle is brought to a complete stop before
crossing the shoulder or roadway of the highway;
(c) The operator yields the right-of-way to all oncoming traffic
that constitutes an immediate potential hazard; and
(d) In crossing a divided highway, the crossing is made only at an
intersection of such highway with a street or road, as applicable.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Road means a public way for the purposes of vehicular travel,
including the entire area within the right-of-way; and
(b) Street means a public way for the purposes of vehicular travel
in a city or village and includes the entire area within the right-of-
way.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. Original sections 44-6408, 60-310, 60-346, 60-509, 60-534,
60-549, and 60-6,381, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section
60-501, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-11-